Maryland, session 2025, HB0876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0876*

HOUSE BILL 876
11–209.
(a) (4) (i) In addition to the equitable remedies or other relief authorized
by this section, the court may assess against any person who violates § 11–204 of this
subtitle a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for each violation, to be paid to the [General
Fund of the State] ACCESS TO COUNSEL IN EVICTIONS SPECIAL FUND.
(ii) Each day that a violation of § 11–204 of this subtitle continues is
a separate violation.
Article – Real Property
8–903.
(a) There is an Access to Counsel in Evictions Program administered by MLSC.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to organize and direct services and resources
in order to provide all covered individuals in the State with access to legal representation
as required under this subtitle.
8–909.
(a) There is an Access to Counsel in Evictions Special Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funding to fully implement access to
legal representation in evictions and other related proceedings in the State.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money received by the Division of Consumer Protection in the Office of
the Attorney General from any final settlement or agreement with or judgment against a
party relating to an investigation or enforcement of the Maryland Consumer Protection Act
for an unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practice for rental residential property, excluding
any restitution and the costs of the action the Attorney General is entitled to recover;
(2) MONEY RECEIVED BY THE ANTITRUST DIVISION IN THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM ANY FINAL SETTLEMENT OR AGREEMENT WITH
OR JUDGMENT AGAINST A PARTY RELATING TO AN INVESTIGATION OR
ENFORCEMENT OF THE MARYLAND ANTITRUST ACT FOR ACTIVITY CONTRIBUTING
TO OR RESULTING IN AN ARTIFICIAL INFLATION OF RENTAL HOUSING COSTS,
EXCLUDING ANY RESTITUTION AND THE COSTS OF THE ACTION THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER;
(3) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;

HOUSE BILL 876 3
[(3)] (4) Money distributed to the Fund under § 17–317 of the Commercial
Law Article;
[(4)] (5) Interest earnings of the Fund; and
[(5)] (6) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.